Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
General provisions

§ 21-43-1.
Power to impose tax on businesses in certain municipalities; purposes for which proceeds may be used.

The governing authority of any municipality in a county bordering on the Gulf of Mexico having therein a family court, and the governing authority of any municipality in any county having a population in excess of thirty-eight thousand (38,000) according to the 1980 decennial census and bordering on the Mississippi River wherein United States Highways 61 and 84 intersect are authorized, in their discretion, to impose a tax on businesses within a parking and business improvement area which is in addition to the general business privilege license tax, and to use such proceeds for the following purposes:

The acquisition, construction or maintenance of parking facilities for the benefit of the area.

Decoration of any public place in the area.

Promotion of public events which are to take place on or in public places in the area.

Furnishing of music in any public place in the area.

The general promotion of retail trade activities in the area.

The construction and maintenance of air-conditioning facilities for the benefit of the area.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 520, § 1; Laws, 1984, ch. 473, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 10, 1984).

§ 21-43-3.
Definitions.

“Parking and business improvement area” or “area” as used in this chapter shall mean an area designated as provided in this chapter.

“Business” as used in this chapter shall mean all types of business, including professions.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 520, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1974.

§ 21-43-5.
Advisory boards.

The governing authority of any participating municipality shall appoint an advisory board consisting of five (5) members who shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority; such board members shall be professional businessmen within the affected area; and such board shall have the sole discretion as to how the revenue derived from the tax is to be used within the scope of the purposes as provided in Section 21-43-1.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 520, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1974.

§ 21-43-7.
Resolution of intention.

A parking and business improvement area may be established whenever the governing authority of any municipality shall by resolution establish such an area. The resolution shall contain the following information:

description of the boundaries of the proposed area;

the time and place of a hearing to be held to consider establishment of an area;

the proposed uses to which the additional revenue shall be put; and

the initial rate of increase, or additional levy, of the license privilege tax, with a breakdown by class of business if such classification is to be used.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 520, § 4(1), eff from and after July 1, 1974.

§ 21-43-9.
Notice of hearing.

Notice of the hearing shall be given by:

One (1) publication of the resolution of intention in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality, which may be made as provided in Section 21-17-19;

Mailing a complete copy of the resolution of intention to each business in the proposed or established area. Publication and mailing shall be completed at least ten (10) days prior to the time of the hearing.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 520, § 4(2); Laws, 1988 ch. 457, § 10, eff from and after December 8, 1988 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the amendment).

§ 21-43-11.
Procedure at hearing.

Whenever a hearing is held under this chapter, the governing authority of any municipality shall hear all protests and receive evidence for or against the proposed action; rule upon all protests which determination shall be final; and may continue the hearing from time to time. Proceedings shall terminate if protest is made by businesses in the proposed area which pay a majority of the taxes within the area under the general business privilege license tax.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 520, § 4(3), eff from and after July 1, 1974.

§ 21-43-13.
Change of boundaries of proposed area.

If the governing authority decides to change the boundaries of the proposed area, the hearing shall be continued to a time not less than fifteen (15) days after such decision and notice shall be given as provided in Section 21-43-9 stating the boundary amendments, but no resolution of intention is required.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 520, § 4(4), eff from and after July 1, 1974.

§ 21-43-15.
Ordinance establishing area.

If the governing authority, following the hearing, decides to establish the proposed area, it shall adopt an ordinance to that effect. This ordinance shall contain the following information:

the number, date and title of the resolution of intention pursuant to which it was adopted;

the time and place the hearing was held concerning the formation of such area;

the description of the boundaries of such area;

a statement that the businesses in the area established by the ordinance shall be subject to the provisions of the additional tax provided by this chapter;

the initial rate of increase, or additional levy, of the privilege license tax to be imposed with a breakdown by classification of business, if such classification is used;

a statement that a parking and business improvement area has been established; and

the uses to which the additional revenue shall be put.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 520, § 4(5), eff from and after July 1, 1974.

§ 21-43-17.
Classification of businesses for tax purposes; exemption of new businesses.

For purposes of the additional tax to be imposed pursuant to this chapter, the governing authority may make a reasonable classification of businesses, giving consideration to various factors.

Businesses recently established in the area may be exempted from the tax imposed pursuant to this chapter for a period not exceeding one (1) year from the date they commenced business in the area.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 520, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1974.

§ 21-43-19.
Collection and use of tax; changes.

The collection of the tax imposed pursuant to this chapter shall be made at the same time and in the same manner as any other business privilege license tax.

Changes may be made in the additional rate or levy or in the uses to which the additional revenue shall be put as specified in the ordinance establishing the area by ordinance adopted after a hearing before the governing authority.

The governing authority shall adopt a resolution of intention to change the additional rate or levy or the uses to which the additional revenue shall be put at least fifteen (15) days prior to the hearing required by this section. This resolution shall specify the proposed change and shall give the time and place of the hearing.

The tax levied hereunder must be for the purposes specified in the ordinances and the proceeds shall not be used for any other purpose.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 520, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1974.

§ 21-43-21.
Disestablishment of area.

The governing authority of any municipality may disestablish an area by ordinance after a hearing before such authority, and such authority shall adopt a resolution of intention to disestablish the area not less than fifteen (15) days prior to the hearing required by this section. The resolution shall state the time and place of the hearing.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 520, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1974.

§ 21-43-23.
Disposition of taxes or assets after disestablishment.

Whenever an area has been disestablished, any remainder of taxes or acquired assets shall be subject to disposition as the advisory board shall determine.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 520, § 8, eff from and after passage July 1, 1974.